New Jersey, session 221, A776.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A student attending a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school shall not be required to wear a face mask while in any indoor or outdoor area of any building of, or while on the grounds of, the public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school which the student is attending.  A student attending a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school shall also not be required to wear a face mask while present on a school bus as defined in R.S.39:1-1. b.    Nothing in subsection a. of this section shall be construed to prohibit any student attending a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school from voluntarily wearing a face mask while in any indoor or outdoor area of any building of, or while on the grounds of, the public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school which the student is attending or while present on a school bus as defined in R.S.39:1-1. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.